Idaho, session 2025, S1126.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 55-2301, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-2301. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Default" means the failure by the lessee to perform, on time, any
obligation or duty set forth in the rental agreement or the provisions of
this chapter.
(2) "Last known address" means that the address provided by the lessee
in the rental agreement or the address provided by the lessee to the operator
in a subsequent written notice of a change of address.
(3) "Leased space" means the individual storage space at the self-ser-
vice storage facility that is or may be rented to a lessee pursuant to a
rental agreement. The leased space may be enclosed, covered, or open stor-
age.
(4) "Lessee" means a person, sublessee, successor, or assignee enti-
tled to the use of a leased space at a self-service storage facility under the
terms of a rental agreement.
(5) "Operator" means the owner, operator, lessor, or sublessor of a
self-service storage facility or an agent or another person authorized to
manage the facility or to receive rent from a lessee under a rental agree-
ment. The term does not include a warehouse operator if the warehouse
operator issues a warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of
title for the personal property stored.
(6) "Personal property" means those items placed within the leased
space and includes, but is not limited to, goods, wares, merchandise, motor
vehicles, watercraft, and household items and furnishings.
(7) "Rental agreement" means a signed, written agreement or contract
that establishes or modifies conditions or rules concerning the use and oc-
cupancy by a lessee of leased space at a self-service storage facility and
includes any signed, written amendment to such an agreement. The rental
agreement may be delivered and accepted electronically.
(8) "Self-service storage facility" means any real property used for
renting or leasing individual storage space in which the lessees themselves
store and remove their own personal property on a "self-service" basis.


(9) "Vehicle" is as defined in section 49-123, Idaho Code, and
"trailer" is as defined in section 49-121, Idaho Code. Should the operator
choose to proceed with a lien sale of a vehicle, the operator must shall com-
ply with the provisions of chapter 17, title 49 section 45-805, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 55-2306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-2306. ENFORCEMENT OF LIEN. (1) A sale of personal property to en-
force a lienholder's claim that has become due against a lessee and that is
secured by the operator's lien may be conducted after the lessee has been in
default continuously for a period of sixty (60) days.
(2) The operator shall send notice by certified mail or as provided for
in the rental agreement to the lessee at his last known address and by mail
to all persons disclosed by the lessee as claiming a security interest in the
stored property. The notice shall include:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the person claiming the
lien;
(b) An itemized statement of the lienholder's claim showing the sum due
at the time of the notice and the date when the sum became due;
(c) A demand for payment within a time specified, not less than ten (10)
days after sending of the notice;
(d) A statement that unless the claim is paid within the time stated in
the notice, the personal property shall be advertised for sale and sold
at a specified time and place, but not sooner than ten (10) days after
the first publication;
(e) A brief and general description of the goods subject to the lien;
and
(f) Notification that the operator has denied or may deny access by the
lessee to his personal property until the lien has been satisfied.
(3) Upon expiration of the time specified in subsection (2)(c) of this
section, an advertisement of the sale shall be published once in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county where the self-service storage facility
is located. The advertisement shall include:
(a) The location, date, time, and manner of the sale of the property
stored in the leased space at the self-service storage facility;
(b) A brief and general description of the personal property; and
(c) The name and last known address of the lessee.
(4) (3) At any time before the advertised sale of the personal property
has been conducted or the vehicle or trailer has been towed, the lessee or any
other person may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien, including all
documented and verifiable labor and expenses incurred in enforcing the lien,
and be permitted to remove the personal property, vehicle, or trailer from
the leased space.
(5) (4) In the event of a sale, the operator shall:
(a) Ensure that the sale is conducted in conformance with the terms of
the published notice;
(b) Identify the specific properties and disclose the names and ad-
dresses provided by the lessee of persons claiming a security interest
in the specified properties; and


(c) Comply with the provisions of chapter 17, title 49 section 45-805,
Idaho Code, when foreclosing on titled vehicles.
(6) (5) The proceeds of the sale must shall be applied to the discharge
of the lien and costs. The remainder, if any, shall be paid over to the lessee
or any other person authorized in writing by the lessee to claim the balance.
(7) (6) The operator may dispose of the personal property without lia-
bility to any person if:
(a) The operator has complied with the provisions of subsections (1)
through (5) (4) of this section and the personal property has not been
purchased;
(b) The lessee fails to remove the personal property from the leased
space after the end of the rental agreement and the rental agreement ad-
vises the lessee that any property remaining after the rental agreement
has ended will be disposed of in the operator's discretion; or
(c) When disposing of titled vehicles, the operator complies with ei-
ther the provisions of chapter 17, title 49 section 45-805, Idaho Code,
or section 55-2308, Idaho Code.
(8) (7) The operator may conduct the lien sale without obtaining an auc-
tioneer's license and may offer the personal property for sale as a unit or
in parcels on a publicly accessible website that regularly offers personal
property for auction or sale, at the self-service storage facility, or at an-
other location determined by the operator.
(9) (8) A purchaser in good faith of any personal property sold pursuant
to this section to satisfy the lien shall take the property free and clear of
any rights of persons against whom the lien was valid, even if the operator
has not complied with the provisions of this chapter or the rental agreement.
SECTION 3. That Section 55-2308, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-2308. LESSEE IN DEFAULT -- VEHICLE OR TRAILER REMOVAL. (1) If a
lessee is in default of the rental agreement for sixty (60) days or more and
the personal property stored in the leased space is a vehicle or trailer, the
operator may have the vehicle or trailer towed from the self-service storage
facility by an independent towing company. Prior to having the vehicle or
trailer towed, the operator shall send notice to the lessee as provided for
in the rental agreement or by certified mail to the last known address stat-
ing:
(a) That the lessee must shall cure the specified default no less than
ten (10) days after sending of the notice;
(b) That unless the default is cured within the time stated in the no-
tice, the vehicle or trailer may be towed; and
(c) The name, address, and telephone number of the towing company.
(2) The operator shall send a copy of the notice by United States mail
with certificate of mailing to any lienholder of the vehicle or trailer that
is listed in the rental agreement, no less than ten (10) days prior to having
the vehicle or trailer towed.
(3) The operator has no liability to any person regarding the vehicle or
trailer once the towing company takes possession of the vehicle or trailer.
(4) Should the operator choose to proceed with a lien sale of a vehicle,
the operator must comply with the provisions of chapter 17, title 49 section


45-805, Idaho Code. The towing company that tows the vehicle must comply
with the provisions of either chapter 17 or 18, title 49, Idaho Code, as ap-
plicable, prior to conducting a sale of the vehicle.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.